Vermont, session 2025-2026, H254.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 663 is added to read:
§ 663. ALTERNATE SERVICE OF PROCESS; DURATION OF ORDER
VT LEG #380758 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.254
2025 Page 2 of 2
When the court orders that alternate service of process be made in a civil
proceeding, the order shall remain in effect and apply to all subsequent service
of process in the same proceeding, including post-judgment proceedings. This
section shall apply to orders issued pursuant to Vermont Rule of Civil
Procedure 4(d)(1) permitting service of process by publication or by leaving a
copy at the defendant’s dwelling house or usual place of abode, or to orders
permitting alternate service of process under any other provision of law.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380758 v.1